Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB11.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 12-5384 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 12-5384. (a) The state 911 board shall:
(1) Coordinate E-911 services and next generation 911 services in the
state;
(2) implement statewide 911 communications planning;
(3) monitor the delivery of 911communications services in the state;
(4) develop strategies for future enhancements to the 911 system;
(5) administer and oversee grants to PSAPs;
(6) develop technology standards;
(7) establish minimum training requirements for:
(A) PSAP personnel, GIS technicians and information technology
technicians with respect to the statewide NG911 call handling system
technology to ensure public safety across Kansas; and
(B) all 911 telecommunicators employed in this state who provide
dispatch for emergency medical conditions as part of such
telecommunicator's regular duties in accordance with the 911
telecommunicator-cardiopulmonary resuscitation training requirements
established pursuant to subsection (f);
(8) employ a full-time executive director; and
(9) make an annual report of all expenditures from the 911 fees
imposed pursuant to K.S.A. 12-5369 and 12-5371, and amendments
thereto, to the house of representatives standing committee on energy,
utilities and telecommunications and the senate standing committee on
utilities or their successor committees.
(b) The state 911 board may:
(1) Contract with any person to assist in the performance of the
powers, duties and functions of the board;

SB 11 2
(2) reimburse state agencies or independent contractors for expenses
incurred in carrying out the powers, duties and functions of the board;
(3) apply for grants under the federal 911 grant program;
(4) recommend training for general PSAP operations;
(5) enter into and support agreements for the interstate and interlocal
interconnection of ESInet service; and
(6) adopt rules and regulations as the board deems necessary for the
implementation and administration of the Kansas 911 act, except that.
(c) The state 911 board shall not establish a mandatory certification
program for PSAP operations or PSAP emergency communications
personnel except that the board may establish a mandatory certification
program for 911 telecommunicator-cardiopulmonary resuscitation
training in accordance with subsection (f).
(c)(d) The state 911 board may impose a civil penalty upon any
provider that fails to collect the 911 fees pursuant to K.S.A. 12-5369, and
amendments thereto, or remit such fees pursuant to K.S.A. 12-5370, and
amendments thereto. Such written order shall state the violation, the
penalty to be imposed and the right of the provider to appeal and request a
hearing before the board. Any such provider may, within 15 days after
service of the order, make a written request to the board for a hearing
thereon. Hearings under this subsection shall be conducted in accordance
with the provisions of the Kansas administrative procedure act. Any action
of the board to impose a penalty shall be subject to review in accordance
with the Kansas judicial review act. Any civil penalty recovered pursuant
to this subsection shall be deposited in the 911 state grant fund.
(d)(e) (1) The executive director of the state 911 board shall:
(A) Be the administrative officer of the board;
(B) be in the unclassified service of the Kansas civil service act; and
(C) receive an annual salary set by the board.
(2) The executive director may hire, subject to the approval of the
board, assistant directors and employees as deemed necessary by the
board. Any such assistant directors or employees shall be in the
unclassified service of the Kansas civil service act.
(e) The provisions of this section shall take effect and be in force on
and after July 1, 2025.
(f) The minimum 911 telecommunicator-cardiopulmonary
resuscitation training established by the state 911 board shall include
training and continuing education instruction that uses current nationally
recognized emergency cardiovascular care guidelines in high-quality
telecommunicator-cardiopulmonary resuscitation. Such instruction shall
incorporate recognition protocols for out-of-hospital cardiac arrest and
compression-only cardiopulmonary resuscitation instructions for callers.
The state 911 board shall monitor and enforce adherence of such training

SB 11 3
and continuing education instruction for all 911 telecommunicators
employed in this state who provide dispatch for emergency medical
conditions as part of such telecommunicator's regular duties.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 12-5384 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.